Utah statutes.
20A-15-201.   Convening -- Vacancies -- Election of officers -- Journal of proceedings.

(1)  The delegates to the convention shall convene at the state capitol at noon on the 28th day after their election to pass upon the question of whether or not the proposed amendment shall be ratified.

(2) (a)  If, at the time the convention convenes, there is a vacancy in the convention, the delegates from the group from which the delegate creating the vacancy was elected shall, by majority vote, appoint a person to fill the vacancy.

(b)  If the convention contains no other delegates from the group from which the delegate creating the vacancy was elected, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy.

(3)  The convention may:

(a)  elect a president, secretary, and other officers; and

(b)  adopt its own rules.

(4)  The convention shall:

(a)  keep a journal of its proceedings;

(b)  record in the journal the vote of each delegate on the question of ratification of the proposed amendment; and

(c)  file the journal  with the lieutenant governor after the convention adjourns.

(5) (a)  Delegates to the ratification convention shall:

(i)  serve without pay;

(ii)  receive a per diem of $4 per day while the convention is in session; and

(iii)  receive  mileage at the rate of 10 cents per mile for the distance necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the place of meeting by the most usual route.

(b)  The lieutenant governor shall pay the per diem and mileage, together with the necessary expenses of the convention for printing and stenographic services, from the state treasury.

